Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3724.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [200.025] RANKED-CHOICE VOTING; PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Federal and state offices. new text end new text begin Ranked-choice voting, or any voting method similar to ranked-choice voting, must not be the method of voting for any federal or state office. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Local offices. new text end new text begin (a) A political subdivision must not adopt or enforce in any manner a rule, resolution, or ordinance establishing ranked-choice voting as a method of voting, or any voting method similar to ranked-choice voting, for local offices within the political subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "political subdivision" includes all counties, cities, townships, and school districts in the state, regardless of whether governed by statute or by home rule charter. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "ranked-choice voting" means any election method in which a voter ranks or assigns a numerical value to candidates for an office in order of the voter's preference. new text end